Utah statutes.
31A-9-405.   Board of directors.

(1) Sections 16-6a-801 and 16-6a-802 apply to fraternals, except that the supreme governing body may act as the board of directors if it meets at least quarterly.  Subsections 31A-5-407(2) through (9) apply to fraternals, except that the word "mutual" shall be read "fraternal" and the references to other sections of Chapter 5 shall be to the corresponding sections of Chapter 9.

(2)  The terms of directors and officers may not exceed four years.

